Hawaii statutes.
[§432E-42] Funding of external
review. The health carrier against which a request for a standard external
review or an expedited external review is filed shall pay the cost of the
independent review organization for conducting the external review. There
shall be no recourse against the commissioner for the cost of conducting the
external review and the selection of an independent review organization shall
not be subject to chapter 103D; provided that the commissioner may initially
approve up to three independent review organizations to serve beginning on the
effective date of this part until the initial procurement process is completed;
provided further that in any year in which procurement subject to chapter 103D
does not produce at least three independent review organizations eligible for
selection under section 432E-39, the commissioner may approve up to three
independent review organizations notwithstanding the requirements of chapter
103D. [L 2011, c 230, pt of §2]

Note

For "effective date of this part", referred to in
second sentence, see L 2011, c 230, §17.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next